Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1718
Professional services; contract; improper action; penalty.

Any architect, professional engineer, professional land surveyor, or landscape architect, or any group, company, or firm who shall offer to pay, or pay, any fee, commission, percentage, gift, or other consideration contingent upon, or resulting from, the award or making of any agency contract for professional services shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 1978, LB 715, § 18;

Laws 2024, LB102, § 50.